Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1008.01
Transportation services bureau; purposes.

The purposes of
the transportation services bureau are to centralize title to
and insure efficient utilization and proper maintenance of all state-owned vehicles, to rent passenger vehicles from a third-party
fleet primarily for transporting state employees from one job location to
another, and to provide vehicle transportation services to all
state agencies, boards, and commissions.

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 39;

Laws 2012, LB779, § 2.